District of Columbia statutes.
8-1825.07

Diseased colonies or equipment.

(a)

The Department shall establish procedures and may take measures to control the spread of bee diseases and may order a beekeeper to take measures to control the spread of bee diseases.

(b)

The Mayor shall treat or destroy the bees, hives, and honey of a beekeeper who fails to take measures ordered by the Mayor to eradicate or control bee disease.

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 217, 60 DCR 1300
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 411(f), 61 DCR 8045
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-142 substituted “Department shall establish procedures and” for “Mayor” in (a).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(h) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that § 411 of the act shall apply as of December 17, 2014.